Georgia statutes. TITLE 47 Retirement and Pensions
CHAPTER 2 Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia

Cross references.

Authorization for establishment of retirement system for employees, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. III, Sec. X, Para. I.

Reimbursement of Department of Law by Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia, Teachers Retirement System of Georgia, Public School Employees Retirement System and Trial Judges and Solicitors Retirement Fund for legal services, § 45-15-37.

Health insurance plan for state employees, § 45-18-1 et seq.

Deferred compensation plans for employees of state, § 45-18-30 et seq.

Provision that exclusion from classified service shall not exclude any employee, officer, or official from membership in Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia, § 45-20-6(c).

Administrative rules and regulations.

Administrative Rules, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia, Chapter 513-1-1.